California, session 20252026, SB329.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11834.11 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:11834.11. The department shall complete conduct an investigation into a complaint regarding an alcohol or other drug recovery or treatment facility in accordance with both of the following requirements: following:(a) The (1) If the department determines that it has jurisdiction over a complaint, the department shall assign a complaint to an analyst for investigation within 10 days of receiving the complaint. (2) If the department receives a complaint that does not fall under its jurisdiction, the department shall notify the complainant in writing, including through electronic means, that it does not investigate that type of complaint.(b) (1) The department shall complete an investigation within 60 days of receiving the complaint. assigning the complaint unless the department requires either of the following:(A) Assistance from local or other state agencies to complete the investigation. (B) Significant additional resources to complete the investigation, as determined by the department. (2) If the department is not able to complete an investigation within 60 days, the department shall notify the complainant in writing, including through electronic means, of the reason for the delay.